Mississippi, session 2026, HB4128.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Omar Eugene Magee of Covington County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Grand Larceny on May 25, 1978, in Covington County, Mississippi, for which he was sentenced to serve sixty (60) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections, released on probation and violated probation.  He was sentenced on December 15, 1978, to serve five (5) years on parole and probation.  On March 28, 1985, in Simpson County, Mississippi, he was sentenced to serve three (3) years for the crime of Burglary, and released on June 20, 1986.  He was sentenced on March 19, 1999, for two (2) counts of the crime of delivery of a Controlled Substance to serve ten (10) years concurrently in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was discharged on September 12, 2008, due to expiration of sentence.  He completed all terms and conditions of his sentence.  The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.